src/orthography/oldorthography2norm.xfscript
! ====================================== !
! Orthographic converter for Meadow Mari !
! ====================================== !

! This program translates text written in the orthographies
! of the 20s and 30s into modern orthography

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


# а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ҥ о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӓ ӹ 
# А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ҥ О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӓ Ӹ 

define Vow = [ а | е | и | э | я | о | у | ё | ю | ӧ | ӱ | А | Е | И | Э | Я | О | У | Ё | Ю | Ӧ | Ӱ ] ; 

define Vow2 = [ а | э | у | А | Э | У ] ; 

define Cns =  [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | ҥ | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | 
                Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н | Ҥ | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;
   

echo << Rules>>

define CnsJV = й -> ъ й || Cns _ Vow2 ;  # пӧрйэҥ -> пӧръйэҥ

define JE =  й э -> е , ь э -> е ; # пӧръйэҥ -> пӧръеҥ
define JA =  й а -> я , ь а -> я ;
define JU =  й у -> ю , ь у -> ю ;

define CnsE = э -> е || Cns _ ;


echo << Combining >>

read regex [ CnsJV
.o. JE 
.o. JA 
.o. JU 
.o. CnsE ] ;

# cd src/orthography/
# xfst -e " source < oldorthography2norm.xfscript "
# invert net
# save o2n.fst
# quit

# Тӱньа ӱмбал шэмэр калыкын пагалымэ, йӧратымэ вуйлатышыжэ ВЛАДИМИР ИЛЬИЧ ЛЕНИН укэ лийэ.

# пӧрйеҥ мутйарым ыштышйӧн
